Maryland, session 2026, HB1114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for the
delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in accordance
with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE,
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET, MEDICALLY APPROPRIATE
DRUGS THAT ARE APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION FOR

HOUSE BILL 1114 3
HIV PREVENTION, INCLUDING:
1. PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS, AS DEFINED IN §
12–515 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; AND
2. POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS.
(b) (32) A managed care organization may not apply a prior authorization
requirement for a prescription drug used as PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS OR
postexposure prophylaxis for the prevention of HIV if the prescription drug is prescribed
for use in accordance with Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Guidelines.
Article – Health Occupations
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(x) (1) “Practice pharmacy” means to engage in any of the following activities:
(xiii) Prescribing and dispensing nicotine replacement therapy
medications; [or]
(xiv) If the pharmacist is registered with the Nonoccupational
Postexposure Prophylaxis (nPEP) Standing Order Program established under § 13–5302 of
the Health – General Article, dispensing nonoccupational postexposure prophylaxis (nPEP)
medication approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and in accordance with
“Updated Guidelines for Antiretroviral Postexposure Prophylaxis After Sexual, Injection
Drug Use, or Other Nonoccupational Exposure to HIV – United States 2016” or subsequent
guidelines published by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; OR
(XV) PRESCRIBING AND DISPENSING PREEXPOSURE
PROPHYLAXIS MEDICATIONS FOR HIV APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH “PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS FOR
THE PREVENTION OF HIV INFECTION IN THE UNITED STATES – 2021 UPDATE: A
CLINICAL PRACTICE GUIDELINE” OR ANY SUBSEQUENT GUIDELINES PUBLISHED BY
THE FEDERAL CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION.
12–515.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CDC GUIDELINES FOR POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS” MEANS
“UPDATED GUIDELINES FOR ANTIRETROVIRAL POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS

HOUSE BILL 1114
AFTER SEXUAL, INJECTION DRUG USE, OR OTHER NONOCCUPATIONAL EXPOSURE
TO HIV – UNITED STATES, 2025” OR ANY SUBSEQUENT GUIDELINES PUBLISHED BY
THE FEDERAL CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION.
(3) “CDC GUIDELINES FOR PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS” MEANS
“PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS FOR THE PREVENTION OF HIV INFECTION IN THE
UNITED STATES – 2021 UPDATE: A CLINICAL PRACTICE GUIDELINE” OR ANY
SUBSEQUENT GUIDELINES PUBLISHED BY THE FEDERAL CENTERS FOR DISEASE
CONTROL AND PREVENTION.
(4) “POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS” MEANS ANY DRUG
COMBINATION APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION THAT IS:
(I) USED TO PREVENT HIV INFECTION FOLLOWING AN
EXPOSURE OR POTENTIAL EXPOSURE TO HIV; AND
(II) ADMINISTERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE CENTERS FOR
DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION, IN THE CDC GUIDELINES FOR
POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS.
(5) “PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS” MEANS ANY DRUG COMBINATION
APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION, INCLUDING ORAL AND
INJECTABLE FORMULATIONS, THAT IS:
(I) PROVIDED TO AN HIV–NEGATIVE PERSON TO PREVENT
HIV INFECTION; AND
(II) ADMINISTERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE CENTERS FOR
DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION, IN THE CDC GUIDELINES FOR
PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS.
(B) (1) A PHARMACIST MAY PRESCRIBE AND DISPENSE A COMPLETE
COURSE OF PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS TO A PATIENT:
(I) UNDER GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD
THROUGH REGULATION;
(II) IF THE PHARMACIST PROVIDES COUNSELING TO THE
PATIENT ON THE USE OF PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS CONSISTENT WITH THE CDC
GUIDELINES FOR PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS, INCLUDING EDUCATION
REGARDING SIDE EFFECTS, SAFETY DURING PREGNANCY AND BREASTFEEDING,
ADHERENCE TO RECOMMENDED DOSING, AND THE IMPORTANCE OF TIMELY
TESTING AND TREATMENT, AS APPLICABLE, FOR HIV AND SEXUALLY TRANSMITTED
DISEASES; AND

HOUSE BILL 1114 5
(III) IF THE PHARMACIST PROVIDES:
1. NOTICE TO THE PATIENT’S PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER
OF THE PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS TREATMENT; OR
2. IF THE PATIENT DOES NOT HAVE A PRIMARY CARE
PROVIDER OR REFUSES TO PROVIDE THE NAME OF A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER, THE
PATIENT WITH A LIST OF PHYSICIANS, CLINICS, OR OTHER HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS IN THE AREA, TO CONTACT REGARDING FOLLOW–UP CARE FOR
POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS.
(2) A PHARMACIST MAY NOT ALLOW A PATIENT TO REFUSE OR WAIVE
A CONSULTATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) (I) BEFORE PRESCRIBING AND DISPENSING PREEXPOSURE
PROPHYLAXIS TO A PATIENT, A PHARMACIST SHALL COMPLETE A TRAINING
PROGRAM APPROVED BY THE BOARD.
(II) THE TRAINING PROGRAM REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ABOUT
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS FOR PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL CONSULT WITH THE STATE BOARD OF
PHYSICIANS, THE STATE BOARD OF NURSING, AND OTHER RELEVANT
STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR HIV CARE SERVICES,
WHEN DEVELOPING OR APPROVING TRAINING PROGRAMS THAT MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(P) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–858 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE SAME MANNER AS THEY APPLY TO
CARRIERS.
Article – Insurance
15–858.
(a) (1) This section applies to:

HOUSE BILL 1114
(i) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide coverage
for prescription drugs under individual, group, or blanket health insurance policies or
contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(ii) health maintenance organizations that provide coverage for
prescription drugs under individual or group contracts that are issued or delivered in the
State.
(2) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefits
manager is subject to the requirements of this section.
(b) An entity subject to this section may not apply a prior authorization
requirement OR STEP THERAPY OR IMPOSE ANY COST–SHARING REQUIREMENTS,
INCLUDING COPAYMENTS, COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLES, for a prescription drug
used as PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS OR postexposure prophylaxis for the prevention of
HIV if the prescription drug is prescribed for use in accordance with Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention guidelines.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE ANY
COST–SHARING REQUIREMENTS, INCLUDING COPAYMENTS, COINSURANCE, OR
DEDUCTIBLES, FOR MEDICALLY NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE SERVICES RELATED
TO THE USE OF PREEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS OR POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS,
INCLUDING:
(1) HIV TESTING;
(2) KIDNEY FUNCTION TESTING;
(3) ONGOING FOLLOW–UP AND MONITORING EVERY 3 MONTHS;
(4) PREGNANCY TESTING;
(5) PROVIDER OFFICE AND TELEHEALTH VISITS FOR PRESCRIBING
AND MEDICATION MANAGEMENT;
(6) SEROLOGIC LABORATORY TESTING FOR HEPATITIS B AND
HEPATITIS C VIRUSES;
(7) TESTING FOR OTHER SEXUALLY TRANSMITTED INFECTIONS,
INCLUDING THREE–SITE TESTING FOR GONORRHEA AND CHLAMYDIA; AND
(8) VACCINATIONS FOR HEPATITIS B.

HOUSE BILL 1114 7
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before October 1, 2026,
the State Board of Pharmacy shall:
(1) develop a plan to ensure pharmacists throughout the State are notified
of the provisions of this Act and the training programs developed or approved under §
12–515(c) of the Health Occupations Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) establish a workgroup with relevant stakeholders to consider and make
recommendations to the General Assembly on collaborative practice agreements or a
statewide protocol under which pharmacists may assess patients, order labs, and prescribe
preexposure prophylaxis.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.